Utah statutes.
62A-11-401.   Definitions.

As used in this part, Part 5, and Part 7:

(1)  "Business day" means a day on which state offices are open for regular business.

(2)  "Child" is defined in Section 62A-11-303.

(3)  "Child support" means a base child support award as defined in Section 78B-12-102, or a financial award for uninsured monthly medical expenses, ordered by a tribunal for the support of a child, including current periodic payments, all arrearages which accrue under an order for current periodic payments, and sum certain judgments awarded for arrearages, medical expenses, and child care costs.  Child support includes obligations ordered by a tribunal for the support of a spouse or former spouse with whom the child resides if the spousal support is collected with the child support.

(4)  "Child support order" or "support order" means a judgment, decree, or order, whether temporary, final, or subject to modification, issued by a tribunal for child support and related costs and fees, interest and penalties, income withholding, attorney fees, and other relief.

(5)  "Child support services" is defined in Section 62A-11-103.

(6)  "Delinquent" or "delinquency" means that child support in an amount at least equal to current child support payable for one month is overdue.

(7)  "Immediate income withholding" means income withholding without regard to whether a delinquency has occurred.

(8)  "Income" is defined in Section 62A-11-103.

(9)  "Jurisdiction" means a state or political subdivision of the United States, a territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, an Indian tribe or tribal organization, or any comparable foreign nation or political subdivision.

(10)  "Obligee" is defined in Section 62A-11-303.

(11)  "Obligor" is defined in Section 62A-11-303.

(12)  "Office" is defined in Section 62A-11-103.

(13)  "Payor" means an employer or any person who is a source of income to an obligor.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 73, 2008 General Session

